New York, session 2025-2026, A7629.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 1367 of the racing, pari-mutuel 2 wagering and breeding law, as added by section 3 of part Y of chapter 59 3 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 4 8. Notwithstanding section thirteen hundred fifty-one of this article, 5 mobile sports wagering gross gaming revenue and tax revenue shall be 6 excluded from sports wagering gross gaming revenue and tax revenue. 7 Mobile sports wagering tax revenue shall be separately maintained and 8 returned to the state for deposit into the state lottery fund for educa- 9 tion aid except as otherwise provided in this subdivision. Any interest 10 and penalties imposed by the commission relating to those taxes, all 11 penalties levied and collected by the commission, and the appropriate 12 funds, cash or prizes forfeited from sports wagering shall be deposited 13 into the state lottery fund for education. In the first fiscal year in 14 which mobile sports wagering licensees commence operations and accept 15 mobile sports wagers pursuant to this section, the commission shall pay 16 into the commercial gaming fund one percent of the state tax imposed on 17 mobile sports wagering by this section to be distributed for problem 18 gambling education and treatment purposes pursuant to paragraph a of 19 subdivision four of section ninety-seven-nnnn of the state finance law; 20 provided however, that such amount shall be equal to [six] twelve 21 million dollars for each fiscal year beginning in two thousand twenty- 22 five and thereafter. In the first fiscal year in which mobile sports 23 wagering licensees commence operations and accept mobile sports wagers 24 pursuant to this section, the commission shall pay one percent of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11282-01-5 A. 7629 2 1 state tax imposed on mobile sports wagering by this section to the 2 general fund, a program to be administered by the office of children and 3 family services for a statewide youth sports activities and education 4 grant program for the purpose of providing annual awards to sports 5 programs for underserved youth under the age of eighteen years; provided 6 however, that such amount shall be equal to five million dollars for 7 each fiscal year thereafter. The commission shall require at least 8 monthly deposits by a platform provider of any payments pursuant to 9 subdivision seven of this section, at such times, under such conditions, 10 and in such depositories as shall be prescribed by the state comp- 11 troller. The deposits shall be deposited to the credit of the state 12 commercial gaming revenue fund. The commission shall require a monthly 13 report and reconciliation statement to be filed with it on or before the 14 tenth day of each month, with respect to gross revenues and deposits 15 received and made, respectively, during the preceding month. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.